Florida, session 2026, SB2512.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsections (1), (5), (7), (18), (19), and (20) 11 of section 26.031, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 12 26.031âJudicial circuits; number of judges.âThe number of 13 circuit judges in each circuit shall be as follows: 14 15 JUDICIAL CIRCUIT TOTAL 16 (1)âFirst...........................................27 26 17 (5)âFifth...........................................35 34 18 (7)âSeventh.........................................30 29 19 (18)âEighteenth.....................................27 26 20 (19)âNineteenth.....................................21 20 21 (20)âTwentieth......................................40 32 22 Section 2.âSubsections (15), (27), (28), (35), (43), (48), 23 and (66) of section 34.022, Florida Statutes, are amended to 24 read: 25 34.022âNumber of county court judges for each county.âThe 26 number of county court judges in each county shall be as 27 follows: 28 29 COUNTY TOTAL 30 (15)âDuval..........................................20 17 31 (27)âHighlands........................................2 1 32 (28)âHillsborough...................................26 25 33 (35)âLee.............................................10 9 34 (43)âMiami-Dade.....................................50 47 35 (48)âOrange.........................................24 22 36 (66)âWalton...........................................2 1 37 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.